Utah statutes.
38-10-109.   Limitation on liability for other owners in production unit if
notice provided -- Contents of notice -- Filing of notice -- Time for filing
-- Failure to file does not affect other defenses.
(1)  Where work is performed or materials or equipment are furnished for any
production unit under a contract with an owner of an interest in the
production unit, any interest of any other owner in the production unit shall
not be subject to a lien under this chapter, if such other owner gives written
notice that he will not be responsible for work performed or materials or
equipment provided.
(2)  Written notice shall be:
(a)  in recordable form;
(b)  filed with the county recorder of the county where the production unit is
located; and
(c)  filed within ten working days after the latter of:
(i)  the owner obtaining knowledge of the performance of such work or the
providing of such materials or equipment; or
(ii)  the execution by the last party of:
(A)  a farmout agreement;
(B)  a lease or sublease;
(C)  an operating agreement;
(D)  an assignment of less than 100% of the lessee's interest or operating
rights under a lease;
(E)  a sales contract; or
(F)  an option agreement.
(3)  Failure to file under this section shall not impair any other defense
available to such owner.
